Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,128
Rehabilitation services; aggrieved person; State Board of Education; fair hearing.

Any individual applying for or receiving vocational rehabilitation who is aggrieved by any action or inaction of the Division of Rehabilitation Services shall be entitled to a fair hearing in accordance with regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Board of Education.

Laws 1955, c. 324, § 8, p. 1005;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1453;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 910.